Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201020-131.02
Housing accommodations; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 20-131.01 to 20-131.04, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Housing accommodations means any real property which is used or occupied or is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied as the home, residence, or sleeping place of one or more human beings. Housing accommodations does not include any single-family residence in which the owner lives and in which any room is rented, leased, or provided for compensation to persons other than the owner or primary tenant; and

(2) Physically disabled person means a person with a physical disability other than hearing impairment, blindness, or visual handicap.

Laws 1975, LB 83, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 254, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB806, § 9.